Utah statutes.
70A-9a-319.    Rights and title of consignee with respect to creditors and
purchasers.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), for purposes of
determining the rights of creditors of, and purchasers for value of goods
from, a consignee, while the goods are in the possession of the consignee, the
consignee is deemed to have rights and title to the goods identical to those
the consignor had or had power to transfer.
(2)  For purposes of determining the rights of a creditor of a consignee, law
other than this chapter determines the rights and title of a consignee while
goods are in the consignee's possession if, under this part, a perfected
security interest held by the consignor would have priority over the rights of
the creditor.
